en: Air Fresheners
xx: Air Fresheners
cs: Osvěžovače vzduchu
da: Luftfriskere
de: Lufterfrischer
es: Ambientadores
fr: Assainisseurs d'air
it: Deodoranti per ambienti
ja: 消臭・芳香剤
nl: Luchtverfrissers
no: Luftfriskere
pl: Odświeżacze powietrza
pt: Aromatizador de ambiente
ru: Освежители воздуха
sv: Luftfräschare
tr: Hava Temizleyiciler

en: Candles
xx: Candles
cs: Svíčky
da: Stearinlys
de: Kerzen
es: Velas
fr: Bougies, Bougie, Chandelle, Cierge
it: Candele
ja: キャンドル
nl: Kaarsen
no: Stearinlys
pl: Świece
pt: Velas
ru: Свечи
sv: Ljus
tr: Mumlar

en: Fragrance Oil
xx: Fragrance Oil
cs: Vonné oleje
da: Duftolier
de: Duftöle
es: Aceites aromáticos
fr: Huiles parfumées
it: Oli profumati
ja: アロマオイル
nl: Geuroliën
no: Duftolje
pl: Olejki zapachowe
pt: Óleos da fragrância
ru: Ароматические масла
sv: Doftoljor
tr: Güzel Kokulu Yağlar

en: Incense
xx: Incense
cs: Kadidlo
da: Røgelse
de: Räuchermittel
es: Incienso
fr: Encens
it: Incenso
ja: お香
nl: Wierook
no: Røkelse
pl: Kadzidełka
pt: Incenso
ru: Благовония
sv: Rökelse
tr: Tütsüler

en: Potpourri
xx: Potpourri
cs: Vonné směsi
da: Potpourri
de: Potpourri
es: Popurrí
fr: Pots pourris
it: Potpourri
ja: ポプリ
nl: Potpourri
no: Potpurri
pl: Potpourri
pt: Pot-pourri
ru: Ароматические смеси
sv: Potpurri
tr: Potpuriler

en: Wax Tarts
xx: Wax Tarts
cs: Voskové bábovičky
da: Vokstærter
de: Duftwachs
es: Figuras de cera
fr: Tartelettes de cire parfumée
it: Torte di cera
ja: スイーツキャンドル
nl: Nepgebak
no: Vokskaker
pl: Woski zapachowe
pt: Tortinhas de cera
ru: Ароматический воск
sv: Vaxkakor
tr: Şekilli Mumlar

en: Hourglasses
xx: Hourglasses
cs: Přesýpací hodiny
da: Timeglas
de: Sanduhren
es: Relojes de arena
fr: Sabliers
it: Clessidra
ja: 砂時計
nl: Zandlopers
no: Timeglass
pl: Klepsydry
pt: Ampulhetas
ru: Песочные часы
sv: Timglas
tr: Kum Saatleri

en: House Numbers & Letters
xx: House Numbers & Letters
cs: Domovní čísla a písmena
da: Husnumre og -bogstaver
de: Hausnummern & Buchstaben
es: Números y letras para casas
fr: Chiffres et lettres décoratifs
it: Numeri e lettere per abitazioni
ja: 表札用切り文字
nl: Huisnummers en -letters
no: Husnumre og -bokstaver
pl: Cyfry i litery elewacyjne
pt: Letras e números para casa
ru: Номера и буквы для домов
sv: Husnummer och -bokstäver
tr: Kapı Numaraları ve Harfleri

en: Lawn Ornaments & Garden Sculptures
xx: Lawn Ornaments & Garden Sculptures
cs: Zahradní dekorace
da: Havedekorationer
de: Gartendeko
es: Adornos para césped y esculturas para jardín
fr: Décorations de pelouse et sculptures de jardin
it: Ornamenti e sculture per il giardino
ja: ガーデン装飾品
nl: Gazonornamenten en tuinbeelden
no: Hageutsmykning og -skulpturer
pl: Ozdoby trawnikowe i rzeźby ogrodowe
pt: Enfeites de jardim e grama
ru: Садовые и газонные украшения
sv: Trädgårdsprydnader
tr: Çim Süsleri ve Bahçe Heykelleri

en: Mail Slots
xx: Mail Slots
cs: Vhozy pro poštu
da: Brevsprækker
de: Briefschlitze
es: Ranuras de correo
fr: Fentes à lettres
it: Buche delle lettere
ja: 郵便差入口
nl: Postvakken
no: Brevinnkast
pl: Zdobienia otworów na listy
pt: Abertura em portas ou paredes para correspondência
ru: Прорези для почты
sv: Brevinkast
tr: Posta Atma Delikleri

en: Mailbox Accessories
xx: Mailbox Accessories
cs: Poštovní schránky – příslušenství
da: Postkasse – tilbehør
de: Briefkasten-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para buzones
fr: Accessoires de boîte aux lettres
it: Accessori per cassette postali
ja: 郵便ポスト用品
nl: Accessoires voor brievenbussen
no: Postkassetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do skrzynek pocztowych
pt: Acessórios para caixa de correio
ru: Принадлежности для почтовых ящиков
sv: Tillbehör till postlådor
tr: Posta Kutusu Aksesuarları

en: Mailbox Covers
xx: Mailbox Covers
cs: Čelní desky k poštovním schránkám
da: Folie til postkasser
de: Briefkastengehäuse
es: Cubiertas para buzones
fr: Stickers décoratifs pour boîtes à lettres
it: Coperture per cassette delle lettere
ja: 郵便ポストカバー
nl: Brievenbushoezen
no: Postkasselokk
pl: Ozdobne osłony skrzynek pocztowych
pt: Capa para caixa de correio
ru: Крышки для почтовых ящиков
sv: Brevlådehöljen
tr: Posta Kutusu Kaplamaları

en: Mailbox Enclosures
xx: Mailbox Enclosures
cs: Skříně na schránky
da: Postkasse – rammer
de: Briefkastenanlagen
es: Armarios de buzones
fr: Boîtiers de boîte aux lettres
it: Strutture per cassette postali
ja: 機能門柱
nl: Behuizingen voor brievenbussen
no: Postkassekabinetter
pl: Osłony na skrzynki pocztowe
pt: Armários para caixas de correio
ru: Шкафы для почтовых ящиков
sv: Inbyggningsstrukturer till postlådor
tr: Posta Kutusu Mahfazaları

en: Mailbox Flags
xx: Mailbox Flags
cs: Vlaječky na schránky
da: Flag til postkasser
de: Briefkastenfahnen
es: Banderas para buzones
fr: Drapeaux de boîtes à lettres
it: Bandierine per cassette delle lettere
ja: 郵便ポスト用フラッグ
nl: Brievenbusvlaggen
no: Flagg til postkasser
pl: Flagi do skrzynek pocztowych
pt: Bandeira para caixa de correio
ru: Флажки для почтовых ящиков
sv: Brevlådeflaggor
tr: Posta Kutusu Bayrakları

en: Mailbox Posts
xx: Mailbox Posts
cs: Sloupky na poštovní schránky
da: Postkasse – stolper
de: Briefkasten-Standanlagen
es: Postes para buzones
fr: Poteaux de boîte aux lettres
it: Pali per cassette postali
ja: スタンド式郵便ポスト
nl: Palen voor brievenbussen
no: Postkassestolper
pl: Słupki na skrzynkę pocztową
pt: Hastes de caixa de correio
ru: Столбы для почтовых ящиков
sv: Postlådestolpar
tr: Posta Kutusu Direkleri

en: Mailbox Replacement Doors
xx: Mailbox Replacement Doors
cs: Náhradní dvířka k poštovním schránkám
da: Låger til postkasser
de: Briefkastentüren
es: Puertas de recambio para buzones
fr: Portes de rechange pour boîtes à lettres
it: Sportelli sostitutivi per cassette delle lettere
ja: 郵便ポスト用扉
nl: Vervangende brievenbusdeurtjes
no: Postkassedører
pl: Drzwiczki zamienne do skrzynek pocztowych
pt: Porta avulsa de caixa de correio
ru: Запасные дверцы для почтовых ящиков
sv: Reservdörrar för brevlådor
tr: Posta Kutusu Yedek Kapakları

en: Mailboxes
xx: Mailboxes
cs: Poštovní schránky
da: Postkasser
de: Briefkästen
es: Buzones de correo
fr: Boîtes aux lettres
it: Cassette postali
ja: ポスト・郵便受け
nl: Brievenbussen
no: Postkasser
pl: Skrzynki pocztowe
pt: Caixas de correio
ru: Почтовые ящики
sv: Postlådor
tr: Posta Kutuları

en: Mirrors
xx: Mirrors
cs: Zrcadla
da: Spejle
de: Spiegel
es: Espejos
fr: Miroirs, Miroir (glace)
it: Specchi
ja: 鏡
nl: Spiegels
no: Speil
pl: Lustra
pt: Espelhos
ru: Зеркала
sv: Speglar
tr: Aynalar

en: Music Boxes
xx: Music Boxes
cs: Hudební automaty
da: Spilledåser
de: Spieluhren
es: Cajas de música
fr: Boîtes à musique
it: Carillon
ja: オルゴール
nl: Muziekdozen
no: Spilledåser
pl: Pozytywki
pt: Caixas de música
ru: Музыкальные шкатулки
sv: Musiklådor
tr: Müzik Kutuları

en: Napkin Rings
xx: Napkin Rings
cs: Kroužky na ubrousky
da: Servietringe
de: Serviettenringe
es: Servilleteros
fr: Ronds de serviettes
it: Portatovaglioli
ja: ナプキンリング
nl: Servetringen
no: Serviettringer
pl: Pierścienie do serwetek
pt: Anéis para guardanapos
ru: Кольца для салфеток
sv: Servettringar
tr: Peçete Halkaları